Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6182.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Budget" means a plan of financial operation for a given period of time, including an estimate of all proposed expenditures from the funds of a local unit and the proposed means of financing the expenditures. As used in section 4(1), budget does not include any of the following: (i) A fund for which the local unit acts as a trustee or agent. (ii) An intragovernmental service fund. (iii) An enterprise fund. (iv) A public improvement or building and site fund. (v) A special assessment fund. (b) "Credit card" means a card or device issued under a credit card arrangement by a any of the following: (i) A person licensed under 1984 PA 379, MCL 493.101 to 493.114. , by a (ii) A person licensed under the consumer financial services act, 1988 PA 161, MCL 487.2051 to 487.2072. , or by a (iii) For 6 months after the effective date of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, a depository financial institution, as that term is defined in section 1a of the mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1651a. (iv) Beginning on the effective date of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, a depository institution, as that term is defined in section 3 of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act. (c) "Credit card arrangement" means an unsecured extension of credit for purchasing goods or services from the credit card issuer or any other person that is made to the holder of a credit card and that is accessed with a credit card. (d) "Credit card policy" means a policy adopted by resolution of a local unit under section 3. (e) "Governing body" means any of the following: (i) The council, commission, or other entity vested with the legislative power of a village. (ii) The council or other entity vested with the legislative power of a city. (iii) The township board of a township. (iv) The county board of commissioners of a county. (v) The board of county road commissioners of a county. (vi) The board of education of a local school district. (vii) The board of education of an intermediate school district. (viii) The board of trustees of a community college district. (ix) The official body to which is granted general governing powers over an authority or organization of government established by law that may issue obligations under the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821, and that may expend funds of the authority or organization. (x) A community mental health authority created under section 205 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1205. (f) "Local school district" means a school district organized under the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852, or a district governed by a special or local act. (g) "Local unit" means any of the following: (i) A village. (ii) A city. (iii) A township. (iv) A county. (v) A county road commission. (vi) A local school district. (vii) An intermediate school district. (viii) A community college district. (ix) An authority or organization of government established by law that may issue obligations under the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821, and that may expend funds of the authority or organization. (x) A community mental health authority created under section 205 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1205. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6177 (request no. H05171'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.